Missouri, session 2026, HB2788.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
D
Section A. Section 571.070, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 571.070, to read as follows:
571.070. 1. A person commits the offense of unlawful possession of a firearm if such
H
person knowingly has any firearm in his or her possession and:
(1) Such person has been convicted of a felony under the laws of this state, or of a
crime under theT laws of any state or of the United States which, if committed within this state,
would be a felony. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply as follows:
(a)IIf such felony conviction was a conviction of a violent felony under the laws
of this state or of a crime under the laws of any state or of the United States that if
W
committed within this state would be a violent felony, possession under this subdivision
shall not be an offense after a period of ten years has passed following the date of
sentence completion for the felony conviction; and
(b) If such felony conviction was a conviction of a nonviolent felony under the
laws of this state or of a crime under the laws of any state or of the United States that if
committed within this state would be a nonviolent felony, possession under this
subdivision shall not be an offense after a period of three years has passed following the
date of sentence completion for the felony conviction; or
(2) Such person is a fugitive from justice, is habitually in an intoxicated or drugged
condition, or is currently adjudged mentally incompetent.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2788 2
2. Unlawful possession of a firearm is a class C felony, unless a person has been
convicted of a dangerous felony as defined in section 556.061, or the person has a prior
conviction for unlawful possession of a firearm in which case it is a class B felony.
3. The provisions of subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section shall not apply to
the possession of an antique firearm.
N
4. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Nonviolent felony", any felony offense that does not involve the use of force,
or threat of force, against another person; W
(2) "Sentence completion", the date on which a person has satisfied all
obligations placed on the person as part of the sentence, including any period of
incarceration and any period of supervised probation or parole;
A
(3) "Violent felony", any felony offense that involves the use of force, or threat of
force, against another person.
R✔
D
H
T
I
W